Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.724

Youth and young adults exiting publicly funded system of care—Housing stability for youth in crisis pilot programs. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall select, monitor, and provide funding and assistance for a minimum of six total counties that implement housing stability for youth in crisis programs as described in this section for a period of three years.

(2) The housing stability for youth in crisis pilot programs must include the following components:

(a) Regular trainings provided to all appropriate juvenile court staff regarding risk factors and identifiers for youth homelessness;

(b) An identification and referral system used throughout the juvenile court system where all appropriate court staff use routine data flags to identify youth at risk for youth homelessness and refer youth to the housing stability coordinator described under (c) of this subsection;

(c) A dedicated housing stability coordinator in each participating county that receives referrals, conducts housing stability assessments with youth and caregivers, connects youth and caregivers with relevant community providers based on assessments, and follows up on referrals;

(d) A model of homelessness prevention services that provides the appropriate amount of intervention based on the youth or family needs; and

(e) Coordinated housing services for youth experiencing homelessness.

(3) By October 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature and the governor that includes:

(a) An evaluation of the housing stability for youth in crisis programs that includes outcome data for participants;

(b) Recommendations for improving the housing stability for youth in crisis programs; and

(c) Recommendation for expanding the housing stability for youth in crisis programs.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[ 2022 c 137 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 137: See note following RCW 43.330.723.